Oklahoma, session 2025, SB919.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1023a of Title 64, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For the purposes of leases entered into by the Commissioners


of the Land Office, “commercial lease” shall mean a lease for those


trust lands which may have a greater value or use which enables it


to earn more income per year than if used strictly for agricultural


purposes. Any lease entered into for the purpose of renewable

Req. No. 183 Page 1


energy generation on and after the effective date of this act shall


be considered a commercial lease.


B. No agricultural lease shall be executed in favor of any


corporation or its agent, or a third party for the use and benefit


of a corporation, except as provided in Section 951 et seq. of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 18 O.S. 2021, Section 955, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 955. A. No person, corporation, association, or any


other entity shall engage in farming or ranching, or own or lease


any interest in land to be used in the business of farming or


ranching, except the following:


1. Natural persons and the estates of such persons;


2. Trustees of trusts; provided that:


a. each beneficiary shall be a person or entity


enumerated in paragraphs 1 through 5 of this


subsection, and


b. there shall not be more than ten beneficiaries unless


the beneficiaries in excess of ten are related as


lineal descendants or are or have been related by


marriage or adoption to lineal descendants, and


c. at least sixty-five percent (65%) of the trust’s


annual gross receipts shall be derived from farming or


ranching, or from allowing others to extract minerals

Req. No. 183 Page 2


underlying lands held by the trust. If the trust


cannot comply with the annual gross receipts test, the


trust may furnish records of its gross receipts for


each of the previous five (5) years, or for each year


that it has been in existence if less than five (5)


years, and the average of such annual gross receipts


may be used for purposes of complying with this


section;


3. Corporations, as provided for in Sections 951 through 954 of


this title, or as otherwise permitted by law;


4. Partnerships and limited partnerships; provided that:


a. each partner shall be a person or entity enumerated in


paragraphs 1 through 5 of this subsection, and


b. there shall not be more than ten partners unless said


the partners in excess of ten are related as lineal


descendants or are or have been related by marriage or


adoption to lineal descendants, and


c. at least sixty-five percent (65%) of the partnership’s


annual gross receipts shall be derived from farming or


ranching, or from allowing others to extract minerals


underlying lands held by the partnership. If the


partnership cannot comply with the annual gross


receipts test, the partnership may furnish records of


its gross receipts for each of the previous five (5)

Req. No. 183 Page 3


years, or for each year that it has been in existence


if less than five (5) years, and the average of such


annual gross receipts may be used for purposes of


complying with this section; and


5. Limited liability companies formed pursuant to the Oklahoma


Limited Liability Company Act; provided that:


a. each member shall be a person or entity enumerated in


paragraphs 1 through 5 of this subsection, and


b. there shall not be more than thirty members unless


said the members in excess of thirty are related as


lineal descendants or are or have been related by


marriage or adoption to lineal descendants, and


c. at least sixty-five percent (65%) of the limited


liability company’s annual gross receipts shall be


derived from farming or ranching, or from allowing


others to extract minerals underlying lands held by


the limited liability company. If the limited


liability company cannot comply with the annual gross


receipts test, the limited liability company may


furnish records of its gross receipts for each of the


previous five (5) years, or for each year that it has


been in existence if less than five (5) years, and the


average of such annual gross receipts may be used for


purposes of complying with this section, and

Req. No. 183 Page 4


d. the limited liability company is not engaged in


renewable energy generation.


B. Any farming or ranching corporation, trust, partnership,


limited partnership, limited liability company or other entity which


violates any provisions of this section shall be fined an amount not


to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) per day until the violation


ceases. Any other person or entity who knowingly violates this


section shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor.


C. The provisions of this act Section 951 et seq. of this title


shall not apply to interests in land acquired prior to June 1, 1978.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 64 O.S. 2021, Section 1013, as


amended by Section 40, Chapter 228, O.S.L. 2022 (64 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 1013), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1013. A. The Commissioners of the Land Office shall be


responsible for the investment of the permanent school funds, other


educational funds and public building funds solely in the best


interests of the current and future beneficiaries. The


Commissioners of the Land Office shall make investments:


1. For the exclusive purpose of:


a. providing maximum benefits to current and future


beneficiaries, and


b. defraying reasonable expenses of administering the


trust funds;



Req. No. 183 Page 5


2. With the care, skill, prudence and diligence under the


circumstances then prevailing that a prudent person acting in a like


enterprise of a like character and with like aims would use; and


3. By diversifying the investments of the trust funds so as to


minimize the risk of large losses.


B. The permanent school fund and other educational funds may


only be invested in bonds issued in the United States, United States


dollar denominated or other investments settled in United States


dollars or traded on the United States exchange markets and real


property to be owned or acquired by the Commissioners of the Land


Office. The Commissioners of the Land Office shall not invest more


than sixty percent (60%) of the trust fund investments in equity


securities. The Commissioners of the Land Office are further


authorized to acquire, purchase, exchange and grant any real


property under its jurisdiction as is necessary to carry out the


investment in the real property. The Commissioners of the Land


Office shall not invest more than five percent (5%) of the total


value of the assets of the permanent school funds in connection with


investments in real property. The calculation of investments in


real property within the five percent (5%) cap shall not include the


value of real property under long-term lease to the State of


Oklahoma, agencies of the state or subdivisions thereof. In no case


shall the Commissioners of the Land Office bid against private-



Req. No. 183 Page 6


sector bidders above the appraised value of any property to be


acquired.


C. The Commissioners shall establish an investment committee.


The investment committee shall be composed of not more than three


members of the Commissioners of the Land Office or their designees.


The committee shall make recommendations to the Commissioners of the


Land Office on all matters related to the choice of managers of the


assets of the funds, on the establishment of investment and fund


management guidelines, and in planning future investment policy.


The committee shall have no authority to act on behalf of the


Commissioners of the Land Office in any circumstances whatsoever.


No recommendations of the committee shall have effect as an action


of the Commissioners of the Land Office or take effect without the


approval of the Commissioners as provided by law. The Commissioners


shall promulgate and adopt on an annual basis an investment plan.


The investment plan shall state the criteria for selecting


investment managers, the allocation of assets among investment


managers, and established standards of investment and fund


management.


D. The Commissioners shall retain qualified investment managers


to provide for investment of the fund monies and for the management


of investment real property pursuant to the investment plan.


Investment managers shall be chosen by a solicitation of proposals


on a competitive bid basis pursuant to standards set by the

Req. No. 183 Page 7


Commissioners. Subject to the investment plan, each investment


manager shall have full discretion in the management of the funds or


investment real property allocated to the investment managers. The


funds allocated to investment managers shall be actively managed by


them, which may include selling investments and realizing losses if


the action is considered advantageous to longer term return


maximization. Because of the total return objective, no distinction


shall be made for management and performance evaluation purposes


between realized and unrealized capital gains and losses.


E. The Commissioners shall take any measures they deem


appropriate to safeguard custody of securities and other assets of


the trusts.


F. By September 1 of each year, the Commissioners shall develop


a written investment plan for the trust funds.


G. The Commissioners shall compile a quarterly financial report


showing the performance of all the combined funds under their


control on a fiscal year basis. The report shall contain a list of


all investments made by the Commissioners and a list of any


commissions, fees or payments made for services regarding the


investments for that reporting period. The report shall be based on


market values and shall be compiled pursuant to uniform reporting


standards prescribed by the Oklahoma State Pension Commission for


all state retirement systems. The report shall be distributed to



Req. No. 183 Page 8


the Oklahoma State Pension Commission, the Cash Management and


Investment Oversight Commission, and the Legislative Service Bureau.


H. Before January 1 of each year, the Commissioners shall


publish an annual report of all Trust operations, presented in a


simple and easily understood manner to the extent possible. The


report shall be submitted to the Governor, the Speaker of the House


of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the


State Department of Education and each higher education beneficiary.


The annual report shall cover the operation of the Trusts during the


past fiscal year including income, disbursements and the financial


condition of the Trusts at the end of each fiscal year on a cash


basis. The annual report shall also contain a summary of the assets


of each trust and current market value as of the report date.


I. The Cash Management and Investment Oversight Commission


shall review reports prepared by the Commissioners of the Land


Office pursuant to this subsection and shall make recommendations


regarding the investment strategies and practices, the development


of internal auditing procedures and practices and any other matters


as determined necessary and applicable.


J. The Commissioners of the Land Office shall select one or


more custodial banks to settle transactions involving the investment


of the funds under the control of the Commissioners of the Land


Office. The Commissioners of the Land Office shall review the


performance of each custodial bank at least once every year. The

Req. No. 183 Page 9


Commissioners of the Land Office shall require a written competitive


bid every ten (10) years. The custodial bank shall have a minimum


of Five Hundred Million Dollars ($500,000,000.00) in assets to be


eligible for selection. Any out-of-state custodial bank shall have


a service agent in the State of Oklahoma so that service of summons


or legal notice may be had on the designated agent, and the bank


shall submit to the jurisdiction of Oklahoma state courts for


resolution of any and all disputes. In order to be eligible for


selection, the custodial bank shall allow electronic access to all


transaction and portfolio reports maintained by the custodial bank


involving the investment of state funds under control of the


Commissioners of the Land Office and to the Cash Management and


Investment Oversight Commission. The requirement for electronic


access shall be incorporated into any contract between the


Commissioners of the Land Office and the custodial bank. Neither


the Commissioners of the Land Office nor the custodial bank shall


permit any of the funds under the control of the Commissioners of


the Land Office or any of the documents, instruments, securities or


other evidence of a right to be paid money to be located in any


place other than within a jurisdiction or territory under the


control or regulatory power of the United States government.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-183 RD 1/19/2025 5:45:59 AM

Req. No. 183 Page 10